California statutes. Public Resources Code
(c) The departments may enter into a contract or contracts with the federal government to pay or repay one-half of the separable capital costs involved in the development of the recreation or fish and wildlife enhancement features, or both, at the project pursuant to the provisions of Public Law 89-72, consistent with the reports provided for in Section 5094.2. The agreement for the payment or repayment of the separable capital costs shall be limited to those recreation or fish and wildlife enhancement facilities, or both, specified in the contract. Such payments or repayments may be made by any or all of the following methods: by legislative appropriation; by provision of lands, interests therein, or facilities for the project; or by a contract or contracts for repayment, with interest, within 50 years of first use of project recreation or fish and wildlife enhancement facilities specified in the contract or contracts. The source of repayment may be limited to entrance and user fees or charges collected at the project by the contracting department if such fees or charges dedicated to repayment are established on a basis calculated to achieve repayment and are made subject to review and renegotiation at intervals of not more than five years. If the source of repayment is so limited, revenues derived from such fees or charges shall be deposited in a special account in the Special Deposit Fund in the State Treasury and used for the purpose of such repayment. If not so limited, the source of repayment shall be such appropriations of funds as may from time to time be made for such purpose by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 798.)
-------------------------------------------

5094.4.

This chapter shall not apply to the cooperation and participation with the federal government pursuant to Public Law 89-161 in the development of recreation facilities or fish and wildlife enhancement facilities, or both, at Auburn Dam and Reservoir, Folsom Dam and Reservoir, Nimbus Dam and Lake Natomas, and County Line Dam and Reservoir, and stream areas in the immediate vicinity of these facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 143.)
-------------------------------------------

5094.5.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Porter-Cobey Federal Water Project Recreation Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 143.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.55. State Urban Parks and Healthy Communities Act [5095. - 5095.6.]

5095.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the State Urban Parks and Healthy Communities Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 877, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5095.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Parks and recreation provide opportunities for building strong communities and promote ethnic and cultural harmony.

(b) The state parks system and the network of community and regional parks, along with park professionals, are in a unique position to promote educational, recreational, and community services that foster partnerships with schools, nonprofit organizations, and other government organizations that serve as a foundation for the healthy development of our communities.

(c) California’s population is growing increasingly diverse and it is incumbent upon state and local governments, working with local education entities, to develop and integrate programs and educational curriculum that take full advantage of the state’s natural environs.

(d) Today, many of our communities are in distress and face increasingly complex problems of poverty, race relations, environmental concerns, crime, and inadequate education facilities. These problems are exacerbated by the lack of communication, collaboration, and services in our inner cities. More and more local agencies, along with nonprofit community-based organizations, are called upon to provide recreation, after school programs, and community services to meet these growing problems.

(e) Most state, community, and regional parks play a role in educating the public about our cultural diversity, historical roots, biological networks, and ecological systems. To do this effectively, these entities need to identify and integrate themes within our state and local parks systems that are relevant to urban communities and, to the extent possible, work with local education agencies to better define those themes and provide increased opportunities for children to access California’s park network as a “living classroom.”

(f) There are numerous examples across the state where collaborative efforts on behalf of state, community, and regional parks working in conjunction with community-based organizations and local education entities have developed programs, providing children with exemplary outdoor educational experiences.

(g) Often, inner city and minority youth populations lack access to recreational opportunities.

(h) Recreational and athletic activities have served to break down color barriers in various communities and allowed individuals such as Tiger Woods and Venus Williams to blaze new cultural and societal trails, serving as positive role models for urbanized youth throughout the nation.

(i) In addition, many urban areas throughout the state lack the financial means or availability of property to acquire and develop parks and recreation areas and facilities, particularly in the neighborhoods that are currently least served in this area.

(j) To promote a greater sense of responsibility toward new parks and recreation areas and facilities, it is vital to encourage community participation in the development of new parks and recreation areas and facilities, which will help keep them clean and safe and enhance community pride and sustain neighborhood vitality.

(k) Recreation, team sports, and games build self-esteem, confidence, social harmony, independent thinking, self-discipline, sportsmanship, and health and help to develop skills in conflict resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 877, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5095.2.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Active recreational purpose” means an activity that requires athletic fields, courts, gymnasiums, or other recreational venues for youth soccer, baseball, football, basketball, tennis, or swimming, or any activity the department identifies as meeting this definition.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(c) “Director” means the Director of Parks and Recreation.

(d) “Facility” includes a place for organized team sports, outdoor recreation, permanent play structures, and multipurpose structures designed to meet the special recreational, educational, vocational, and social needs of youth. “Facility” also includes the acquisition of properties or development of venues for the furtherance of the purposes of Section 5095.4 where existing state conservancies or state, community, or regional parks are not readily accessible.

(e) “Fund” means the State Urban Parks and Healthy Communities Fund.

(f) “Nonurbanized local agency” means any city, county, or district that qualifies as a nonurbanized area as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 5621 and that is eligible for grant funding pursuant to Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 5620).

(g) “Special district” means a regional park district, regional park and open-space district, or regional open-space district formed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Chapter 3, or a recreation and park district formed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 5780).

(h) “State agency” includes the Department of Parks and Recreation and the state conservancies in existence on the effective date of the act adding this section during the 2001 portion of the 2001–02 Regular Session.

(i) “Urbanized or heavily urbanized local agencies” include cities, counties, or a city and county, or special districts as determined by the Department of Finance according to the latest verifiable census data pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 5621.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 181.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5095.3.

There is hereby created, in the State Treasury, the State Urban Parks and Healthy Communities Fund. The department shall expend moneys from this fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to provide grants to state agencies, including state conservancies in existence on January 1, 2002, urbanized or heavily urbanized local agencies, and community-based organizations, in accordance with Sections 5095.4 and 5095.5. Funds necessary to administer this chapter shall be appropriated in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 975, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5095.4.

(a) The director, in consultation with the State Department of Education, shall develop a competitive grant program to assist state parks, state conservancies in existence as of January 1, 2003, urbanized and heavily urbanized local agencies, and community-based organizations within those jurisdictions, working in collaboration, to provide outdoor educational opportunities to children.

(1) Applicant entities shall provide a 25-percent matching contribution in community resources. The matching contributions may be in the form of money, including funds from other state or local assistance programs, gifts of real property, equipment, and consumable supplies, volunteer services, free or reduced-cost use of land, facilities, or equipment, and bequests and income from wills, estates, and trusts. The department may establish findings for hardships to waive the matching requirement when an applicant cannot meet the requirement.

(2) The department may give additional consideration to applicant entities collaborating with other entities, including, but not limited to, school districts, faith-based groups and others providing outreach programs to identify and attract urbanized youth most in need of organized, constructive recreational activities.

(b) The department shall make one-third of any funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter available to give special priority to providing increased access for elementary schoolage children in grades 2 to 8, inclusive, to conservancy or state, community, and regional park properties and, in addition, shall give priority, in awarding a grant pursuant to this section, to all of the following:

(1) Programs that use curriculum tied to the science content standards and science framework adopted by the State Board of Education.

(2) Applicants that serve children with family incomes below the statewide average, based on the most recent figures computed and established by the Department of Finance.

(3) Applicants that provide access to children who are underserved or lack access to parks or other outdoor venues suitable to conduct appropriate environmental education instruction.

(4) Applicants that have developed working collaboratives to develop environmental education partnerships.

(5) Applicants working in collaboration with local educational agencies to identify those children lacking adequate opportunities to access outdoor environmental education curriculum or innovative or alternative recreation programming.

(c) The amount of a grant awarded pursuant to this section may not be less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000). A grant may be expended for any of the following purposes:

(1) Staffing that is directly associated with the programming.

(2) Staff training or development directly associated with the programming.

(3) Costs associated with transporting youth between a community or school and the proposed environmental education venue.

(4) Medical insurance for the participants, only if the insurance is a requirement pursuant to the activity.

(5) Operational costs, such as the rental equipment, food, and supplies.

(6) Applicants that can demonstrate that the administrative costs associated with this activity will not exceed more than 7.5 percent of the amount of the grant.

(d) The department may gather information from the applicants as to the effectiveness of these programs in meeting program objectives. The department shall summarize this information and report to the appropriate budget and fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature as to the number of children served, the educational objectives met, and the level of demand.

(e) Applicant agencies may enter into contracts with other public agencies or entities to provide unique interpretive skills or to present authentic, curriculum-based programs in units of conservancy properties or state, community, or regional park systems for services not otherwise provided. The purpose of this subdivision is to authorize the applicants to provide programming services, equipment, and materials that assist in the curriculum program or provide educational activities that assist in the presentation of cultural traditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 975, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5095.5.

(a) The department shall allocate two-thirds of any funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter to provide grants to urbanized or heavily urbanized local agencies or community-based organizations within these jurisdictions for the acquisition and development of properties for active recreational purposes, as defined. Eligible projects shall meet all of the following criteria:

(1) The amount of the grant applied for, together with any matching contribution, shall meet all of the cost of acquiring and developing the project, and when construction of the project is completed, the new urban park or facility shall have a management plan and demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the applicant agencies have sufficient means to ensure that the park or facility shall remain open and accessible to the public.

(2) The application includes a commitment for a matching contribution. The matching contributions may be in the form of money, including funds from other state or local assistance programs, gifts of real property, equipment, and consumable supplies, volunteer services, free or reduced-cost use of land, facilities, or equipment, and bequests and income from wills, estates, and trusts. The department may establish findings for hardships to waive the matching requirement when an applicant cannot meet the requirement.

(3) To the extent practicable, the project is a joint-use project between two or more agencies that share responsibility for ownership, development, or maintenance, or both, of the project.

(b) The department shall adopt guidelines to amplify or clarify the criteria specified in Section 5095.4 or this section, and may adopt additional criteria, to supplement those criteria.

(c) The department may develop a procedural guide for the administration of this chapter and the guidance of applicants.

(d) The department shall solicit written comments and hold public hearings at convenient locations throughout the state on any regulations, guidelines, or the procedural guide proposed to be adopted or developed pursuant to this section.

(e) The department shall adopt guidelines to implement this chapter.

(f) Any regulation, guideline, or procedural guide adopted or developed pursuant to this chapter is not subject to the review or approval of the Office of Administrative Law or to any other requirement of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(g) A grant received pursuant to this section may be expended to acquire the fee title or other interest in real property. If an application proposes to acquire less than fee title, the applicant shall demonstrate in the application, to the satisfaction of the department, that the proposed project will provide public benefits that are commensurate with the type and duration of the interest in real property to be acquired.

(h) With the consent of an urbanized or heavily urbanized local agency, any eligible nonprofit organization that is tax exempt pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code may apply for a grant on behalf of an entity for the purposes of either Section 5095.4 or this section. The application shall include a copy of any contract between the local agency and the nonprofit organization and the resolution or other authorization of consent. The contract shall specify arrangements for the long-term management and operation of the urban park or recreation area commensurate with the amount of the grant, as determined by the department.

(i) Every applicant for a grant pursuant to this section and the entity that will operate and maintain the property, if that entity is different than the applicant, shall agree to comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) To operate and maintain the property developed pursuant to this chapter so that it is usable by residents of the affected area. With the approval of the department, the grant recipient, or its successor in interest in the property, may transfer its property interest and the responsibility to operate and maintain the property, in accordance with the terms of the grant and any applicable law, to a public agency or nonprofit organization that is able to operate and maintain the property in perpetuity. Any attempt to make a transfer in violation of this subdivision is void.

(2) To use the property only for the purposes for which the grant was made and to make no other use or sale or other disposition of the property, except as authorized by statute. If the use of the property is changed to a use that is not permitted by the terms of the grant, or if the property is sold or otherwise disposed of, the grant recipient shall reimburse the department an amount equal to the amount of the grant, the fair market value of the land and any improvements constructed with the grant, or the proceeds from the sale or other disposition, whichever amount is greater. If the property that is sold or otherwise disposed of is less than the entire interest in the property funded with the grant, the grant recipient shall reimburse the department an amount equal to either the proceeds from the sale or other disposition of the interest or the fair market value of the interest sold or otherwise disposed of, whichever amount is greater.

(3) In lieu of seeking reimbursement pursuant to paragraph (2), the department may impose restrictions on the use of public park property identical to the requirements for the preservation of public parks set forth in the Public Park Preservation Act of 1971 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 5400)) with respect to any property used, sold, or otherwise disposed of in a manner not permitted by the terms of the grant.

(j) The recipient of a grant pursuant to this chapter may use the grant funds to pay for any portion of the cost of cleaning up, removing, or remediating any toxic materials or hazardous substances, if the amount used for cleanup, removal, or remediation does not exceed 20 percent of the grant allocated to the project.

(k) The amount allocated pursuant to this chapter shall be roughly divided 60 percent to the southern portion of the state (south of the Tehachapi Mountains) and 40 percent to the northern portion.

(l) Recognizing that some rural areas of the state have significant deficiencies of park facilities for active recreational purposes, the department shall consider allocating two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) pursuant to this section to nonurbanized local agencies. In awarding these grants, the department shall apply the same guidelines as those established for awarding a grant to a nonurbanized area pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 5621.

(m) After all grants authorized under this chapter have been awarded, the department shall report to the Budget Committee of the Assembly and the Budget and Fiscal Review Committee of the Senate on the number of grant applications received, the total amount of funds sought by applicants, and the number of eligible applications that were not funded.

(n) Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit community-based organizations from acting in partnership with organizations that do not have tax-exempt status as a nonprofit organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 975, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5095.6.

(a) This chapter shall be implemented only upon appropriation of sufficient funds to the department for that purpose.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision, all funds that are appropriated to the department pursuant to this chapter shall be encumbered within three years of the date of that appropriation and expended within eight years of the date of that appropriation.

(c) Any grants to state or local agencies or nonprofit organizations or community groups pursuant to this chapter, on or after January 1, 2003, shall be contingent upon a future appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 975, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.57. Central Valley Vision [5095.50. - 5095.54.]

5095.50.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Central Valley” means the geographic region extending from approximately the City of Redding in the north to the Tehachapi Mountains in the south, and from the valley floor up to 2,000 feet elevation along the coastal range in the west and the Sierra Nevada range in the east.

(b) “Plan” means the detailed plan of implementation developed by the department for its Central Valley Vision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 546, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5095.51.

The department shall develop a detailed plan of implementation for its Central Valley Vision. The plan shall identify and prioritize specific sites and projects for acquisition and development in the Cental Valley, based on the following objectives:

(a) Expansion of resource protection and access to recreational opportunities at existing state parks and other public lands.

(b) Acquisition of lands with important natural, cultural, and recreational values, focusing on lands that link state parks with other public lands, particularly along water corridors.

(c) Preservation and interpretation of historical and cultural resources.

(d) Expansion of interpretive and recreational programs and opportunities in state park units.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 546, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5095.52.

To the extent feasible, the plan shall do all of the following:

(a) Identify specific opportunities and priorities for acquisition and development of new and existing parks and recreational opportunities, with priority given to the following:

(1) Areas with significant or threatened natural resource values, as blue oak and sycamore woodlands, riparian and wetland areas, and native grasslands.

(2) Areas along river corridors and other water bodies, and in the Sacramento/San Joaquin Delta.

(3) Areas that can be linked with other state park units or public lands, providing natural corridors and linkages for wildlife and trails.

(4) Areas with unique California cultural and historical values.

(5) Areas with the capacity to support recreational activities for which there is a demonstrated unmet public interest and demand.

(b) Expand opportunities and facilities for multiple and diverse recreational activities, based on identified public interest and demand.

(c) Expand educational and interpretive services and facilities, focusing on the unique cultural and historical resources of the Central Valley.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 546, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5095.53.

The plan shall include a specific timeline for implementation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 140.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5095.54.

This chapter shall be implemented to the extent that funds are appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 75063 or any other source.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 546, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.68. Nejedly-Hart State, Urban,and Coastal Park Bond Act of 1976 [5096.111. - 5096.139.]

5096.111.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Nejedly-Hart State, Urban, and Coastal Park Bond Act of 1976.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 259.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 2, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.112.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:

(a) It is the responsibility of this state to provide and to encourage the provision of recreational opportunities for the citizens of California.

(b) It is the policy of the state to preserve, protect, and, where possible, to restore coastal resources which are of significant recreational or environmental importance for the enjoyment of present and future
 generations of persons of all income levels, all ages, and all social groups.

(c) When there is proper planning and development, parks, beaches, recreation areas and recreational facilities, and historical resources preservation projects contribute not only to a healthy physical and moral environment, but also contribute to the economic betterment of the state, and, therefore, it is in the public interest for the state to acquire, develop, and restore areas for recreation, conservation, and preservation and to aid local governments of the state in acquiring, developing, and restoring such areas as will contribute to the realization of the policy declared in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 259.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 2, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.113.

The Legislature further finds and declares that:

(a) The demand for parks, beaches, recreation areas and recreational facilities, and historical resources preservation projects in California is far greater than what is presently available, with the number of people who cannot be accommodated at the area of their choice or any comparable area increasing rapidly.

(b) The demand for parks, beaches, recreation areas
 and recreational facilities, and historical resources preservation projects in the urban areas of our state are even greater: over 90 percent of the present population of California reside in urban areas; there continues to be approximately a 30 percent deficiency in open space and recreation areas in the metropolitan areas of the state; less urban land is available, costs are escalating, and competition for land is increasing.

(c) There is a high concentration of urban social problems in California’s major metropolitan areas which can be partially alleviated by increased recreational opportunities.

(d) California’s coast provides a great variety of recreational opportunities not found at inland sites; it is heavily used because the state’s major urban areas lie, and 85 percent of the state’s population lives, within 30 miles of the Pacific Ocean; a shortage of facilities for
 almost every popular coastal recreation activity exists; and there will be a continuing high demand for popular coastal activities such as fishing, swimming, sightseeing, general beach use, camping, and day use. Funding for the acquisition of a number of key coastal sites is critical at this time, particularly in metropolitan areas where both the demand for and the deficiency of recreational facilities is greatest. Current development pressures in urbanized areas threaten to preclude public acquisition of these key remaining undeveloped coastal parcels unless these sites are acquired in the near future. 

(e) Increasing and often conflicting pressures on limited coastal land and water areas, escalating costs for coastal land, and growing coastal recreational demand requires, as soon as possible, funding for, and the acquisition of, land and water areas needed to meet demands for coastal recreational opportunities and to implement recommendations
 for acquisitions of the Coastal Plan prepared and adopted in accordance with the requirements of the California Coastal Zone Conservation Act of 1972.

(f) By 1980, the need for local parks, beaches, and recreation areas and recreational facilities will be nearly twice as great as presently required.

(g) By 1980, unless the lands and waters that hold recreation potential today are acquired or reserved for recreation as soon as possible, there will be a marked shortage of recreation lands and waters on a local and regional basis.

(h) Cities, counties, and districts must exercise constant vigilance to see that the parks, beaches, recreation lands and recreational facilities, and historical resources they now have are not lost to other uses; they should acquire additional lands as such lands become available; they should
 take steps to improve the facilities they now have.

(i) Past and current funding programs have not and cannot meet present deficiencies.

(j) There is a pressing need to provide statutory authority and funding for a coordinated state program designed to provide expanded public access to the coast, to preserve prime coastal agricultural lands, and to restore and enhance natural and man-made coastal environments.

(k) In view of the foregoing, the Legislature declares that an aggressive, coordinated, funded program for meeting existing and projected recreational demands must be implemented without delay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 259.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 2, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.114.

Bonds in the total amount of two hundred eighty million dollars ($280,000,000), or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed hereinafter, and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. Said bonds shall, when sold, be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California are hereby pledged for the
 punctual payment of both principal and interest on said bonds as said principal and interest become due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 259.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 2, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.115.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected such sum in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state as shall be required to pay the principal and interest on said bonds maturing in said year, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of said revenue to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect such additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 259.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 2, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.116.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this act, such an amount as will equal the following:

(a) Such sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal and interest on bonds issued and sold pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, as said principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Such sum as is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section
 5096.117, which sum is appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 259.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 2, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.117.

For the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter the Director of Finance may by executive order authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the State, Urban, and Coastal Park Fund or the State Coastal Conservancy, which depositories are hereby created. Any moneys made available under this section shall be returned to the General
 Fund from moneys received from the sale of bonds sold for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 259.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 2, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.1175.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this bond act, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this bond act that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required
 under federal law, or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 652, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.118.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the State, Urban, and Coastal Park Fund or the State Coastal Conservancy. The money in such depositories may be expended only for the purposes specified in this chapter and only pursuant to appropriation by the Legislature in the manner hereinafter prescribed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 259.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 2, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.119.

All proposed appropriations for the program specified in Section 5096.124 shall be included in a section in the Budget Bill for each fiscal year for consideration by the Legislature, and shall bear the caption “Nejedly-Hart State, Urban, and Coastal Park Bond Act Program.” The section shall contain separate items for each project for which an appropriation is made.

All proposed appropriations for purposes specified in Section 5096.125 shall be included in a section of the Budget Bill for each
 fiscal year for consideration by the Legislature, and shall bear the caption “State Coastal Conservancy.” The section shall contain separate items for each project for which an appropriation is made.

Such appropriations shall be subject to all limitations contained in the Budget Bill and to all fiscal procedures prescribed by law with respect to the expenditure of state funds unless expressly exempted from such laws by a statute enacted by the Legislature. Such sections shall contain proposed appropriations only for the programs contemplated by this chapter, and no funds derived from the bonds authorized by this chapter may be expended pursuant to an appropriation not contained in such sections of the Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 259.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 2, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.120.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code) and all of the provisions of that law are applicable to the bonds and to this chapter, and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 259.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 2, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.121.

The State Park and Recreation Finance Committee is hereby created. The committee consists of the Governor, the State Controller, the Director of Finance, the State Treasurer, and the Secretary of the Resources Agency. For the purposes of this chapter the State Park and Recreation Finance Committee shall be “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law. The Secretary of the Resources Agency is hereby designated as “the board” for the purposes of this chapter and for the purposes of the State General Obligation
 Bond Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 259.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 2, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.122.

All money deposited in the State, Urban, and Coastal Park Fund or the State Coastal Conservancy which is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in such depositories and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 259.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 2, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.123.

As used in this chapter and for the purposes of this chapter as used in the State General Obligation Bond Law, the following words shall have the following meanings:

(a) “State grant” or “state grant moneys” means moneys received by the state from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter which are available for grants to counties, cities, and districts for acquisition, development, or restoration of real property for park, beach, recreational, and historical resources
 preservation purposes.

(b) “District” means any district authorized to provide park and recreation services, except a school district.

(c) “Historical resource” includes, but is not limited to, any building, structure, site, area, or place which is historically or archaeologically significant, or is significant in the architectural, engineering, scientific, economic, agricultural, educational, social, political, military, or cultural annals of California.

(d) “Historical resources preservation project” is a project designed to preserve an historical resource which is either listed in the National Register of Historic Places or is registered as either a state historical landmark or point of historical interest pursuant to Section 5021.

(e) “Coastal
 recreational resources” means those land and water areas adjacent to or in close proximity to the Pacific Ocean which are suitable for public park, beach, or recreational purposes, including, but not limited to, areas of historical significance and areas of open space that complement park, beach, or recreational areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 259.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 2, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.124.
